Nevada, session 83, AB526.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. 1. The Department of Motor Vehicles shall
immediately cease the use of any existing electronic system of the
-
*AB526*

– 2 –
Department for the scheduling or granting of appointments for
document preparation services that:
(a) Denies or limits the ability of a document preparation service
to schedule or receive an appointment with the Department based
solely on:
(1) The point in time at which the service began conducting
transactions with the Department on behalf of clients; or
(2) The duration of time that the service has been conducting
transactions with the Department on behalf of clients in comparison
with the duration of time that other document preparation services
have been conducting such transactions with the Department; or
(b) Grants certain document preparation services more favorable
or expansive access to appointments or the ability to schedule
appointments than is available to other document preparation
services for reasons unrelated to misconduct by the document
preparation service.
2. As used in this section, “document preparation service”
means a document preparation service registered pursuant to chapter
240A of NRS.
Sec. 2. This act becomes effective upon passage and approval.
H
-
*AB526*